District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.03

Director; appointment, qualifications, compensation, term.

(a)

The Department shall be headed by a Director who shall be appointed by the Mayor, with the advice and consent of the Council, pursuant to § 1-523.01(a).

(b)

The Director shall be knowledgeable about forensic science services and experienced in the rigors of scientific analysis. The Director shall have:

(1)

Graduated from an accredited college or university with a masters or doctoral degree in an applicable area of science;

(2)

Demonstrated training and experience in scientific research and methodology;

(3)

Demonstrated management and administrative skills;

(4)

Demonstrated comprehensive knowledge of forensic sciences;

(5)

A minimum of 6 years experience in scientific research, forensic sciences, or a combination thereof; and

(6)

A minimum of 4 years experience in directing or supervising both scientific and administrative staff in a forensic science, medical, or research setting.

(c)

The Mayor shall fix the compensation of the Director pursuant to subchapter X-A of Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-610.51 et seq.].

(d)

The Director shall be appointed for a 4-year term.

(e)

If a vacancy in the position of the Director occurs as a consequence of any reason, the Mayor shall appoint a successor for a new term, in the same manner provided by this chapter.

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 4, 58 DCR 5403

History